Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MANDATORY ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT WORKSHEET FOR PUBLIC DRAINAGE PROJECTS.new text end new text begin (a) The Environmental Quality Board must amend Minnesota Rules, part 4410.4300, to require an environmental assessment worksheet for any drainage project, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 103E.005, subdivision 11, that meets the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) a drainage project with a drainage area equal to or exceeding five square miles located in the Minnesota River Basin hydrologic unit code 6 watershed including Minnesota major watersheds 22 to 33, as defined by the commissioner of natural resources; or new text end new text begin (2) a drainage project that alters the course, current, or cross section of: new text end new text begin (i) a public water designated under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.101, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (ii) an outstanding resource value water listed in Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0335; or new text end new text begin (iii) a lake or stream designated by the commissioner of natural resources as a trout lake or a trout stream under Minnesota Statutes, section 97C.005. new text end new text begin (b) The board may use the good cause exemption under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), to adopt rules under this section, and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end